public_html/app/tools/lang/data/dict-vec-oxt/dictionaries/vec2.dic
inakuar/A
inalborar/A
alŧar/A
analiđar/A
reanemar/A
ardentar/A
arxinar/A
inarpeđar/A
astiar/A
aŧidar/A
autoridar/A
inaxolar/A
bagajar/A
xbajar/A
inbalar/A
balegar/A
dexbaƚonar/A
inbalsamar/A
baluxenar/A
kontrabandonar/A
barakar/A
xbarbatolar/A
barlúxer/A
bastardar/A
batixar/A
basiƚar/A
dexbavarar/A
befar/A
inbeletar/A
bersajar/A
beverar/A
xbiankeđar/A
inbiavar/A
inkonbinar/A
birar/A
bivakar/A
xbocar/A
reboɉir/A
inbokoƚar/A
inbolponar/A
abonbar/A
borir/A
bordixar/A
inboskaɉar/A
inbotonar/A
inbosolar/A
inbragar/A
bramidar/A
xbraŧar/A
xbregar/A
brindar/A
dexbrojar/A
bronbolar/A
brunar/A
buelar/A
burlar/A
inbutirar/A
xbuxolar/A
scarir/A
cekolar/A
ocèñer/A
tracéñer/A
ciƚar/A
scokixar/A
maledir/A
daŧiar/A
xdentegar/A
devastar/A
xdindolar/A
redíxer/A
doler/A
domar/A
dopiar/A
dormikiar/A
dreŧar/A
dulkorar/A
inxaƚar/A
davaɉar/A
inxenerar/A
xogolar/A
konđónxer/A
adornar/A
dugolar/A
konxurar/A
èser/A
reelèđer/A
epilogar/A
eterniđar/A
exerŧitar/A
ƚikuefar/A
sfadegar/A
defalkar/A
fameɉar/A	po:verb
sfangar/A
infatir/A
faŧionar/A
bonifegar/A
ratifegar/A
fenir/A
konferir/A
festeđar/A
infiar/A
infiapir/A
resfidar/A
desfilar/A
fiƚoxofar/A
fiondar/A
fisar/A
dexafitar/A
desfodrar/A
sfojar/A
konfónder/A
konfortar/A
formigolar/A
renforŧar/A
fradelidar/A
frànđer/A
infrapoƚir/A
fraudar/A
sfregar/A
fríxer/A
frodar/A
fruñolar/A
fulmenar/A
sfuregar/A
fuxilar/A
galantejar/A
galonar/A
ingameƚar/A
ingansar/A
xgarbelar/A
garofoƚir/A
gavasar/A
xginŧar/A
ingolfar/A
dexgorgar/A
dexgradar/A
ingranar/A
ingranfir/A
regraŧiar/A
traxgredir/A
xgrénder/A
grilar/A
ingriñoƚir/A
xgríxer/A
dexgropar/A
dexguantar/A
guarir/A
xguindolar/A
exibir/A
indavalkar/A
ingrotolir/A
rinproverar/A
internar/A
invensionar/A
ixolar/A
inɉarmar/A
xɉavetar/A
dexɉemar/A
xɉinsar/A
dexɉoŧar/A
xɉosolar/A
ɉutar/A
inkadenar/A
kaidar/A
kalefar/A
kalkiđolar/A
skaltrir/A
rekalsitrar/A
inkanar/A
kandidar/A
dekanpar/A
inkantonar/A
kapejar/A
skaponar/A
karameƚar/A
deskargar/A
inkarolar/A
kartedar/A
inskartosar/A
inkastronar/A
deskatijar/A
kasar/A
kauŧionar/A
kavalkar/A
inkaxinar/A
skòder/A
kojonberar/A
skokonar/A
kolmar/A
koltivar/A
komisionar/A
konfesar/A
konpañar/A
skontar/A
skontrar/A
koñar/A
perkórer/A
konkordar/A
inkordar/A
skornidar/A
korteƚar/A
skotoƚar/A
deskovèrđer/A
kréder/A
krestalixar/A
kriveƚar/A
krostenar/A
deskroxar/A
kuadrixar/A
interkuerar/A
kufolar/A
rekuƚar/A
inkuñar/A
kuŧar/A
lakonixar/A
languir/A
lañar/A
ƚardar/A
latar/A
ƚavar/A
lèđer/A
legalidar/A
ƚeñar/A
alevar/A
ƚexierir/A
paralixar/A
likuidar/A
sotolinear/A
lisiar/A
interƚokuir/A
xlongar/A
xlosar/A
ƚumar/A
madurar/A
xmakar/A
xmalŧar/A
manteđar/A
mareƚar/A
maseƚar/A
maŧar/A
frameđar/A
remenar/A
merkantidar/A
inmielar/A
mixurar/A
dexmoƚar/A
sormontar/A
xmoroxar/A
remòver/A
dexmusar/A
nàser/A
xnervađar/A
noliđar/A
inuvolir/A
odiar/A
onbriđar/A
inorbar/A
dexosar/A
padroneđar/A
spaƚar/A
spalpexar/A
pantedar/A
parecar/A
partiŧionar/A
pastidar/A
pasientar/A
spegaŧar/A
inpeƚukar/A
penelar/A
pèrder/A
inpetir/A
inpesar/A
renpiànđer/A
spikar/A
pipar/A
spisar/A
polakar/A
apóner/A
inpontir/A
repopoƚar/A
potacar/A
prestar/A
profetidar/A
puñar/A
rabir/A
ranfar/A
skoraŧar/A
inkuixir/A
resitar/A
dexrisolar/A
prorogar/A
korónper/A
dexrudenir/A
ruviɉar/A
aesaƚar/A
saltinar/A
sasiar/A
scordir/A
sèguer/A
seƚexar/A
señar/A
insestar/A
desiɉiƚar/A
situar/A
skarpelar/A
skenar/A
deskorsar/A
inskurir/A
soleŧitar/A
sopodar/A
spaledar/A
prosperar/A
despinar/A
sprotar/A
istaƚar/A
stekar/A
istitikir/A
strafuñar/A
konstrénxer/A
strumar/A
sudar/A
sutilir/A
atakar/A
tarasar/A
tastixar/A
enténder/A
tentar/A
intratèñer/A
desterminar/A
stirar/A
retoƚar/A
intorbidir/A
kontòrder/A
strabukar/A
intrapolar/A
destregolar/A
trinkar/A
trupar/A
insangolar/A
proŧéder/A
inŧénder/A
inŧèrner/A
sigar/A
ŧiñar/A
inŧivilir/A
insukar/A
uŧar/A
invaƚidar/A
varkar/A
veƚar/A	po:verb
ventixar/A
intravèñer/A
vergixar/A
vertir/A
xviar/A
violar/A
vodar/A
voldar/A
devorar/A
xbravar/A
xgorlar/A
xñikar/A
asentar/A
vibrar/A
fonŧionar/A
seleŧionar/A
frasar/A
intorsar/A
ronŧegar/A
sfojolar/A
stolir/A
brankexar/A
dexgrasiar/A
